Hawaii statutes.
§446E-4 Service of process. (a) Any
unaccredited institution with a presence in the State shall designate and
continuously maintain an agent in this State authorized to accept service of
process on behalf of the institution and shall transmit to the director the
name, address, and telephone number of the agent so designated in a manner
prescribed by the director. The designated agent shall be an agent of the
unaccredited institution for service of any process, notice, or demand required
or permitted by law to be served upon the unaccredited institution.

(b) If an unaccredited institution fails to
appoint or maintain an agent for service of process in this State or the agent
for service of process cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the agent's
address, service of process may be made upon the unaccredited institution by
registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the
unaccredited institution at the most recent address listed in the records of
the director.

(c) Service by registered or certified mail
shall be effected under subsection (b) at the earliest of:

(1) The date the unaccredited institution receives
the process, notice, or demand;

(2) The date shown on the return receipt, if signed
on behalf of the unaccredited institution; or

(3) Five days after its deposit in the mail, if
mailed postpaid and correctly addressed.

(d) This section shall not affect the right to
serve process, notice, or demand in any other manner provided by law. [L 1990,
c 226, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 171, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next